Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.450

Application for and effective date of retirement allowances.

Any member or beneficiary eligible to receive a retirement allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.35.420, 41.35.440, or 41.35.460 shall be eligible to commence receiving a retirement allowance after having filed written application with the department.

(1) Retirement allowances paid to members under the provisions of RCW 41.35.420 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such member's separation from employment.

(2) Retirement allowances paid to vested members no longer in service, but qualifying for such an allowance pursuant to RCW 41.35.420, shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such qualification.

(3) Disability allowances paid to disabled members under the provisions of RCW 41.35.440 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such member's separation from employment for disability.

(4) Retirement allowances paid as death benefits under the provisions of RCW 41.35.460 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following the member's death.

[ 1998 c 341 s 106.]